Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-306
State colleges; president; duties.

The president of each state college shall be the chief executive officer thereof and shall be responsible to the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges for the control and management of the same. All faculty and other employees of each state college shall be under the direction of the president thereof, subject to the general regulations of the board.

Laws 1881, c. 78, sub. XIII, § 8, p. 374;

R.S.1913, § 7065;

C.S.1922, § 6700;

C.S.1929, § 85-309;

Laws 1937, c. 212, § 2, p. 849;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-309;

R.S.1943, § 85-306;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 5, p. 3201;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 6.